Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0625, subdivision 8e, is amended to read: Subd. 8e. Chiropractic services. deleted text begin Payment for chiropractic services is limited to individuals under the age of 21. Coverage for individuals under the age of 21 is limited to one annual evaluation and 24 visits per year unless prior authorization of a greater number of visits is obtained. deleted text end new text begin (a) Medical assistance covers chiropractic services and related services recommended by a health care professional who is: new text end new text begin (1) licensed to perform such related services; and new text end new text begin (2) uses generally accepted chiropractic standards of care. new text end new text begin (b) Covered services to treat acute spinal pain, chronic spinal pain, and neuromusculoskeletal conditions related to the spine include but are not limited to medical evaluation and management of services, manual therapy, spinal manipulation, and therapeutic exercises. new text end new text begin (c) Services covered under this subdivision, other than x-rays, are limited to 24 visits per year unless prior authorization of a greater number of visits is obtained. new text end new text begin (d) Coverage for x-rays is limited to radiological examinations that are: new text end new text begin (1) of the full spine; cervical, thoracic, lumbar, and lumbosacral areas of the spine; pelvis; or sacroiliac joints; and new text end new text begin (2) necessary to support a diagnosis of subluxation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256L.03, subdivision 3b, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06180 256L.03 COVERED HEALTH SERVICES. Subd. 3b. Chiropractic services. MinnesotaCare covers the following chiropractic services for individuals under the age of 21: (1) medically necessary exams; (2) manual manipulation of the spine; and (3) x-rays.